apertium-azz.azz.lexc
LEXICON N-ITL

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>it                                  NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:i%>mej                                 # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-LI

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>i                                   NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>mej                                  # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-IN

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>in                                  NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:i%>mej                                 # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-YO

%<n%>%<abs%>:                                      NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>j                                    # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-NI

%<n%>%<abs%>:                                      NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>j                                    # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-HUITL

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>huit                                NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:u%>tsin                               # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:ui%>tsin                              # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:u%{j%}%>mej                            # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:hui%>mej                               # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:u%>tsi%>tsin                    # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:u                                   CMPND ;

! LEXICON N-HUAN

! %<n%>%<abs%>:n                                     NO-POSS ;
! %<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
! %<n%>%<hon%>:n%>tsin                               # ;
! %<n%>%<pl%>:%>j                                    # ;
! %<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:n%>tsi%>tsin                    # ;
! %<n%>%<cmp%>%+:n                                   CMPND ;

LEXICON N-SPA-PESO

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>:%{j%}                             # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>s                               # ;

LEXICON N-SPA-MESA

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:%{j%}                             # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>s                               # ;

LEXICON N-SPA-PIEDAD

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:                                  # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:e%>s                              # ;

LEXICON N-SPA-LUGAR

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>:                                  # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:e%>s                              # ;

LEXICON N-SPA-LUNES

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>:                                  # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:                                  # ;

LEXICON N-SPA-VEZ

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:z                                 # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:ce%>s                             # ;

LEXICON N-SPA-FUSIÓN

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:ón                                # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:one%>s                            # ;

LEXICON CMPND 

:                                                  Locativos ;
:%>t%{i%}                                          Locativos ;

LEXICON N-POSS

@R.POSS.1@:@R.POSS.1@                              # ; 
@R.POSS.1@:@R.POSS.1@%>%{w%}                       # ;! Dir/RL
@R.POSS.1@%<pl%>:@R.POSS.1@%>huan                  # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>:                                     # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%+:                                   Locativos ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-TLAN

%<np%>%<top%>:n                                    # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%+tampa%<n%>%<rel%>:m%>pa             # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%+:n                                  Locativos ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-KAN

%<np%>%<top%>:n                                    # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%+kampa%<n%>%<rel%>:m%>pa             # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%+:n                                  Locativos ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-PAN

%<np%>%<top%>:n                                    # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%+pampa%<n%>%<rel%>:m%>pa             # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%+:n                                  Locativos ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-EK

%<np%>%<top%>:k                                   # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%+kopa%<n%>%<rel%>:ko%>pa           # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%+:k                                 Locativos ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-KO

%<np%>%<top%>:ko                                   # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%+kopa%<n%>%<rel%>:%>ko%>pa           # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%+:ko                                 Locativos ; 

LEXICON NP-COG

%<np%>%<cog%>:                                     # ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<pl%>:%>mej                          # ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M-TL

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%>                                # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                   # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:                                # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                   # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:                                # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                   # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON DET

%<det%>:                                           # ;

LEXICON DET-OKSE

%<det%>:e                                          # ;
%<det%>%<pl%>:e%>ki%{n%}                           # ;
%<det%>%<pl%>:i%>ki%{n%}                           # ;

LEXICON DET-MIAK
%<det%>:                                           # ;
%<det%>%<pl%>:%>ej                                 # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRON-NEHUATL

%<abs%>:%>huatl                                    # ; 
%<hon%>:%>hua%>tsin                                # ; 
%<short%>:%>j                                      # ; 
%<short%>:                                         # ; 
:%>hua                                             # ; 
:%>jua                                             # ; 

LEXICON PRON-TEHUAN

%<abs%>:%>huan                                     # ; 
%<abs%>:%>hua                                      # ; 
!%<hon%>:%>hua%>tsin                                # ; 
%<short%>:%>jan                                    # ; 
!:%>hua                                             # ; 

LEXICON PRON-SG1

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>:                            PRON-NEHUATL ;

LEXICON PRON-SG2

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>:                            PRON-NEHUATL ;

LEXICON PRON-SG3

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>:                            PRON-NEHUATL ;
 
LEXICON PRON-PL1
 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>:                            PRON-TEHUAN ;
 
LEXICON PRON-PL2
 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>:                            PRON-TEHUAN ;
 
LEXICON PRON-PL3
 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>:                            PRON-TEHUAN ;

LEXICON PRON

%<prn%>:                                           # ;

LEXICON PRON-SEKI

%<prn%>:                                           # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>:%>mej                                # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>:%>n                                  # ;

LEXICON PRON-NEJIN

%<prn%>:                                           # ;
%<prn%>%<pl%>:%>kej                                # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>:                                           # ; 
%<adv%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                              # ; 
%<adv%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                   # ; 

LEXICON Comunes 
chapolin:chapol                                     N-IN ; ! "capulin"
siuapipili:siua%>pipil                              N-LI ; ! "niña"
okichpipili:okich%>pipil                            N-LI ; ! ""
totolin:totol                                       N-IN ; ! ""
xiuyo:xiu%{j%}yo                                    N-YO ; ! ""
naluayo:naluayo                                     N-YO ; ! "raíz"
chokilo:chokilo                                     N-YO ; ! "savia"
tapajtiani:tapajti%{y%}a%>ni                        N-NI ; ! "doctor"
iluikataixpejpenani:iluikataixpejpenani             N-NI ; ! "astrónomo"
piokali:pio%>kal                                    N-LI ; ! "gallinera"
koyotikomit:koyo%>tikom                             N-ITL ; ! "fogón"
ijtikoyokkilit:ijtikoyok%>kil                       N-ITL ; ! ""
tekilit:te%>kil                                     N-ITL ; ! ""
mikexihuit:mike%>xi                                 N-HUITL ; ! ""
tanechikolxihuit:tanechikol%>xi                     N-HUITL ; ! ""
nantsinkohuit:nantsin%>ko                           N-HUITL ; ! ""
nektsin:nekts                                       N-IN ; ! "abeja"
hidrógeno:hidrógeno                                 N-SPA-PESO ; ! ""
vez:ve                                              N-SPA-VEZ ; ! ""
televisión:televisi                                 N-SPA-FUSIÓN ; ! ""
radiación:radiaci                                   N-SPA-FUSIÓN ; ! ""
riñón:riñ                                           N-SPA-FUSIÓN ; ! ""
caporal:caporal                                     N-SPA-LUGAR ; ! ""
universidad:universidad                             N-SPA-PIEDAD ; ! ""
navidad:navidad                                     N-SPA-PIEDAD ; ! ""
comunidad:comunidad                                 N-SPA-PIEDAD ; ! ""
septiembre:septiembre                               N-SPA-PESO ; ! ""
lunes:lunes                                         N-SPA-LUNES ; ! ""
martes:martes                                       N-SPA-LUNES ; ! ""
jueves:jueves                                       N-SPA-LUNES ; ! ""
haba:haba                                           N-SPA-MESA ; ! ""
momia:momia                                         N-SPA-MESA ; ! ""
sierra:sierra                                       N-SPA-MESA ; ! ""
hospital:hospital                                   N-SPA-LUGAR ; ! ""
uno:uno                                             N-SPA-PESO ; ! ""
sabor:sabor                                         N-SPA-LUGAR ; ! ""
LEXICON Propios 
Quetzalcoatl:Quetzalcoa                           NP-ANT-M-TL ; 
Evelyn:Evelyn                                       NP-ANT-F ; 
Deonila:Deonila                                     NP-ANT-F ;
Felipe:Felipe                                       NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Eleuterio:Eleuterio                                 NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Aguilar:Aguilar                                     NP-COG ; 
Martínez:Martínez                                   NP-COG ;
Sakapoastan:Sakapoastan                             NP-TOP ;
Tozan:Tozan                                         NP-TOP ;
Tahchikteko:Tahchikte                               NP-TOP-KO ;
Siltepek:Siltepe                                    NP-TOP-EK ;
Tekoltepek:Tekoltepe                                NP-TOP-EK ;
Tekoltepek:Tekoltepe                                NP-TOP-EK ;
Apipias:Apipias                                     NP-TOP ;
Xochitlan:Xochitla                                  NP-TOP-TLAN ;
Ocotlan:Ocotla                                      NP-TOP-TLAN ;
Huahuaxtlan:Huahuaxtla                              NP-TOP-TLAN ;
Kalikan:Kalika                                     NP-TOP-KAN ; 
Tacuapan:Tacuapa                                    NP-TOP-PAN ; 
Tuzamapan:Tuzamapa                                  NP-TOP-PAN ; 
Zoatecpan:Zoatecpa                                  NP-TOP-PAN ; 
LEXICON Adverbios 
no:no                                               ADV ; ! "también"
tata:tata                                           ADV ; ! "muy bien"
